Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-628
Improvements; tax; when due.

Special taxes as provided in section 16-627 shall be due and may be collected as the improvements are completed in front of or along or upon any block or piece of ground, or at the time the improvement is entirely completed or otherwise, as shall be provided in the ordinance levying the tax.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 76, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 4923;

C.S.1922, § 4091;

C.S.1929, § 16-620;

R.S.1943, § 16-628;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 95.